Maryland, session 2026, HB0973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
3–307.
(a) This section applies only to the following public bodies:
(1) the Board of Directors of the Bainbridge Development Corporation;
(2) the Canal Place Preservation and Development Authority;
(3) the Maryland 9–1–1 Board;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0973*

HOUSE BILL 973
(4) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Agricultural and
Resource–Based Industry Corporation;
(5) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Clean Energy Center;
(6) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Economic Development
Corporation;
(7) the Board of Directors of the Maryland Environmental Service;
(8) the Maryland Food Center Authority;
(9) the Maryland Health and Higher Educational Facilities Authority;
(10) the Maryland Industrial Development Financing Authority;
(11) the Maryland Stadium Authority;
(12) the Maryland Transportation Authority;
(13) the Northeast Maryland Waste Disposal Authority;
(14) the Public Service Commission;
(15) the State Board of Elections;
(16) the Maryland Technology Development Corporation;
(17) the Historic St. Mary’s City Commission;
(18) the State Ethics Commission;
(19) the Maryland Aviation Commission; [and]
(20) the Maryland Department of Transportation, with respect to quarterly
public meetings held by the Vision Zero coordinator on the implementation of Vision Zero
under § 8–1004 of the Transportation Article;
(21) THE MARYLAND STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
(22) THE ACCOUNTABILITY AND IMPLEMENTATION BOARD
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–402 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; AND
(23) THE COUNTY BOARDS OF EDUCATION ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE
3 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 973 3
(b) A public body specified in subsection (a) of this section shall make publicly
available on its website:
(1) each open meeting agenda, together with a summary of any finalized
documents, written testimony from the public, and other materials that the public body
will vote on at the open meeting:
(i) at least 48 hours in advance of each meeting; or
(ii) if the meeting is being held due to an emergency, a natural
disaster, or any other unanticipated situation, as far in advance of the meeting as
practicable;
(2) meeting minutes from the portions of a meeting that were held in open
session, not more than 2 business days after the minutes are approved; and
(3) subject to subsections (f) and (g) of this section, live video streaming of
each portion of a meeting that is held in open session.
(c) To the extent practicable, each open meeting agenda shall indicate:
(1) whether the public body intends to adjourn the open session to a closed
session; and
(2) if applicable, the expected time at which the public body intends to
adjourn the open session to a closed session.
(d) (1) The public body shall approve meeting minutes in a timely manner.
(2) Each open meeting agenda shall include consideration of the meeting
minutes from the most recent meeting.
(3) The requirement under paragraph (2) of this subsection does not apply
to the agenda of an emergency meeting of a public body if consideration of the meeting
minutes from the most recent meeting is not practicable because of the need to hold an
emergency meeting.
(e) The public body shall maintain on its website:
(1) meeting minutes made available under subsection (b) of this section for
a minimum of 5 years after the date of the meeting; and
(2) except as provided in subsections (f), (g), and (g–1) of this section, a
complete and unedited archived video recording of each open meeting for which live video
streaming was made available under subsection (b) of this section for a minimum of 1 year
after the date of the meeting.

HOUSE BILL 973
(E–1) THE PUBLIC BODY SHALL KEEP A COPY OF THE MINUTES OF EACH
SESSION AND ANY RECORDING MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION
FOR AT LEAST 15 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE SESSION.
(f) (1) This subsection applies only to the Maryland Stadium Authority.
(2) If the Maryland Stadium Authority meets by telephone conference, the
Authority shall:
(i) make publicly available on its website live audio streaming of
each portion of the meeting that is held in open session; and
(ii) maintain on its website a complete and unedited archived audio
recording of each meeting for which live audio streaming was made available for a
minimum of 1 year after the date of the meeting.
(g) (1) This subsection applies only to the Maryland Transportation Authority.
(2) The Maryland Transportation Authority is required to provide live
video streaming of a meeting only if the meeting is held at:
(i) the headquarters of the Maryland Transportation Authority; or
(ii) a location where the Maryland Transportation Authority held at
least 10 meetings during the immediately preceding calendar year.
(g–1) The Maryland Department of Transportation, with respect to quarterly public
meetings held by the Vision Zero coordinator on the implementation of Vision Zero under §
8–1004 of the Transportation Article, shall maintain on its website a complete and unedited
archived video recording of the meeting for a minimum of 5 years after the date of the
meeting.
(h) The Department of Information Technology shall provide the technical staff,
support, and equipment necessary to livestream the open meetings of:
(1) the Maryland Transportation Authority;
(2) the State Board of Elections; and
(3) the State Ethics Commission.
(i) For purposes of this title, a project site visit or educational field tour may not
be considered a meeting of a public body listed under subsection (a) of this section if no
organizational business is conducted.
(j) Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a public body from
altering the agenda of a meeting after the agenda has been made available to the public.

HOUSE BILL 973 5
(k) The requirements of this section are in addition to the other requirements of
this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.